Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB956.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2702(c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 2702. Aggravated assault.* * *(c) Officers, employees, etc., enumerated.--The officers, agents, employees and other persons referred to in subsection (a) shall be as follows:* * *(40) An employee of any county, city, borough, incorporated town, township, home rule municipality, optional plan municipality or , optional charter municipality OR <--12345678910111213141516 MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY . * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0956PN1975 - 2 - 123